Hawaii, session 2026, GM1318.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the State continues
to experience a severe shortage of housing that is affordable
for households earning between sixty per cent and one hundred
forty per cent of the area median income, a portion of the
housing market commonly referred to as "missing middle" housing.
The legislature further finds that successful housing programs
in other jurisdictions, such as the BC Builds program
implemented in British Columbia, Canada, demonstrate that a
housing agency must act as a public developer by proactively
acquiring land, securing entitlements, and prepackaging shovel­
ready projects to cut delivery times.
The legislature finds that the BC Builds program is
structured according to a "rocket fuel" project timeline
strategy, which has contributed substantially to the program's
success. BC Build's rocket fuel strategy replaces the standard
thirty-six to sixty-month timeline typical of most construction
projects with a much shorter twelve to eighteen-month project
2026-2352 SB2544 CDl SMA-l.docx 1
iiHiiiiiiingiHHiiiiiiiiiimi

Page 2 S.B. NO. 2544
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
timeline. BC Builds accomplishes this significant reduction in
project timelines by streamlining development processes and
working collaboratively with landowners, municipalities, and
residential developers to work through and remove any barriers.
BC Builds also leverages underused public lands to create more
viable rental projects, along with grant money to keep rents
more affordable and get projects off the ground. BC Build's
approach to housing development has resulted in over thirty
projects in pre-development in the two years since the program
was launched. Many of these projects will deliver over one
hundred units each, significantly expanding the available
housing supply.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Establish within the Hawaii housing finance and
development corporation the Hawaii builds pilot
program as a five-year pilot program, under which:
(A) The corporation may deploy moneys from the
dwelling unit revolving fund for certain
development activities and as active construction
equity;
2026-2352 SB2544 CDl SMA-l.docx 2
iiiHiHiiiBiigiiiiniiiniiMiiHi

Page 3
S.B. NO.
CD. 1
(B) Interagency coordination and expedited review for
designated pilot projects are required by law;
and
(C) A majority of housing units must comply with
requirements established by the Hawaii housing
finance and development corporation under section
201H-38, Hawaii Revised Statutes; and
(2) Establish an annual expenditure cap on the use of
dwelling unit revolving funds that may be used to
implement the Hawaii builds pilot program.
SECTION 2. (a) There is established the Hawaii builds
pilot program within the Hawaii housing finance and development
corporation. The pilot program shall run for a period of five
years as provided in subsection (m).
(b) The board of directors of the corporation shall
designate specific projects as Hawaii builds pilot program
projects, pursuant to the requirements of this Act. To qualify
as a Hawaii builds pilot program project, a project shall:
(1) Be located on a site that possesses, at a minimum,
adequate existing infrastructure capacity, including
2026-2352 SB2544 CDl SMA-l.docx 3
IIMIMMIHMIIIlUiniillin

Page 4 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
water, sewer, and transportation access, to support
the density of the proposed project;
(2) Preferably be located on land zoned for residential
use; provided that project sites that have adequate
infrastructure but are not zoned for residential use
shall remain eligible through the use of exemptions
authorized under section 201H-38, Hawaii Revised
Statutes; and
(3) Ensure that all units in a housing project shall be
consistent with the purposes and intent of chapter
201H, Hawaii Revised Statutes.
(c) The corporation shall designate at least one Hawaii
builds pilot project in each county of the State to ensure
statewide participation in the pilot program.
(d) Notwithstanding any provision of part III, subpart T,
of chapter 201H, Hawaii Revised Statutes, or any other law to
the contrary, the corporation may use not more than $20,000,000
each fiscal year, in the aggregate, from the dwelling unit
revolving fund for the Hawaii builds pilot program for:
(1) Predevelopment activities, including land acquisition,
architectural and engineering services, environmental
2026-2352 SB2544 GDI SMA-l.docx
iMiinniiiiiiiiiiiiHiiiii

Page 5 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
and due diligence studies, entitlement processing, and
other preparatory activities necessary to advance a
project; and
(2) Construction equity, including short-term construction
equity or equity investment, as deemed appropriate by
the corporation’s board of directors.
(e) Predevelopment activities under subsection (d)(1)
shall not require separate gubernatorial approval for each
specific disbursement; provided that the project has been
designated and approved as a Hawaii builds pilot program project
by the corporation's board of directors.
(f) Any use of moneys from the dwelling unit revolving
fund, including but not limited to construction equity or equity
investment under subsection (d)(2), shall be structured to
ensure a reasonable return to the dwelling unit revolving fund.
(g) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, while
the Hawaii builds pilot program is active, the corporation shall
give the highest priority to Hawaii builds pilot program
projects when allocating and disbursing moneys from the dwelling
unit revolving fund.
2026-2352 SB2544 CDl SMA-l.docx 5
■IIHIUIIIIMIMIIUIIIlllPnB

Page 6
S.B. NO. s"
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
(h) The executive director of the corporation may convene
a Hawaii builds expedited review team. The team shall consist
of the directors of relevant state and county agencies or their
designees, including the chairperson of the board of land and
natural resources, director of health, and each county's
planning and public works departments.
(i) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all
state and county agencies shall cooperate with the corporation
in processing Hawaii builds pilot program projects, including
prioritizing the review of permits, licenses, and entitlements
for pilot projects above all other non-emergency applications.
(j) Contracts for professional services, construction, and
development related to Hawaii builds pilot program projects
shall be subject to approval by the corporation's board of
directors and shall be exempt from chapter 103D, Hawaii Revised
Statutes.
(k) The department of health shall complete its review of
hazard evaluation, wastewater, and safe drinking water
applications for Hawaii builds pilot program projects within
sixty days. If additional time is required to complete a review
under this subsection, the department of health shall provide
2026-2352 SB2544 CDl SMA-l.docx 6
HiiiiiniiiiMiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 7
S.B. NO. s"
C.D. 1
written justification for the extension before the sixty-day
period expires. If the department of health does not provide
written justification, the application shall be deemed approved.
(1) The appropriate county planning director, or an
equivalent official having jurisdiction over permitting and
exemptions, shall grant a Hawaii builds pilot program project
all necessary exemptions from county ordinances and rules
pursuant to section 201H-38, Hawaii Revised Statutes.
Notwithstanding any law, county charter provision, or ordinance
to the contrary, an exemption under this subsection shall not
require approval by the county legislative body. The processing
of an exemption for a Hawaii builds pilot program project shall
be deemed a ministerial act and shall be completed within
forty-five days of receipt by the planning director or
equivalent official.
(m) The authority of the corporation to designate new
Hawaii builds pilot program projects under this section shall
expire on June 30, 2031; provided that any project designated as
a Hawaii builds pilot program project before July 1, 2031, shall
continue to be governed by this section until the completion of
the project.
2026-2352 SB2544 CDl SMA-l.docx
IMOnilllMIIIIHIIMHINII

Page 8
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(n) For the purposes of this section, "corporation" means
the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation.
SECTION 3. No later than twenty days prior to the
convening of the regular sessions of 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030,
2031, and 2032, the Hawaii housing finance and development
corporation shall submit to the legislature a report on the
Hawaii builds pilot program that includes:
(1) A list and description of all Hawaii builds pilot
program projects designated, approved, or advanced
during the prior fiscal year;
(2) The amount and type of dwelling unit revolving fund
moneys expended for predevelopment activities and
construction equity, including the status of repayment
or monetization;
(3) The number of housing projects approved, under
construction, and completed, disaggregated by county
and area median income category;
(4) A summary of interagency coordination efforts and the
extent to which statutory timelines were met;
2026-2352 SB2544 CDl SMA-l.docx

Page 9 S.B. NO. 2544
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
(5) Any barriers encountered in project delivery,
including statutory, regulatory, or infrastructure
constraints;
(6) Reconunendations for any amendments to the pilot
program and whether the pilot program should be
continued or terminated; and
(7) Any proposed legislation.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-2352 SB2544 CDl SMA-l.docx 9
inniiiiiiHiiiiigiiinMiMii

2544
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this Sth day of July ,2026
GOVE OR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 2544, S.D. 2, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
42-26

SB No. 2544, SD 2, HD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives